Hawaii statutes.
§635-29 Challenging peremptorily. (a)
In addition to the challenges of jurors allowed in section 635-28, the State
and defendant in criminal cases shall be allowed peremptory challenges as
provided by section 635-30.

(b) In civil cases each party shall be allowed
to challenge peremptorily three jurors, without assigning any reason therefor.
Where there are two or more plaintiffs or two or more defendants, they may be
considered as a single party for the purposes of making peremptory challenges,
or the court may allow additional peremptory challenges and permit them to be
exercised separately or jointly. If additional peremptory challenges are
allowed to the parties on one side, the opposing party or parties may be
allowed additional peremptory challenges.

(c) If an alternate juror or alternate jurors
are to be impaneled, one or more additional peremptory challenges shall be
allowed as provided by the rules of court. [L 1903, c 38, §20; RL 1925, §2418;
am L 1927, c 39, §1; am L 1932 1st, c 11, §1; RL 1935, §3736; RL 1945, §10112;
RL 1955, §231-12; HRS §635-29; am L 1972, c 89, §2B(j)]

Rules of Court

Peremptory challenges in criminal cases, see HRPP rule 24(b).

Sequence for challenging jurors, see RCC rule 17(f).

Case Notes

Where four joint defendants joined in each of ten challenges,
held that they had exercised their full right of challenge, although each would
have been allowed ten challenges if taken separately. 3 H. 90 (1869).

Erroneous overriding of an objection to a juror by court avails
nothing to the party objecting if party has not exhausted party's peremptory
challenges. 8 H. 339 (1892).

Prejudicial if accused compelled to exhaust peremptory
challenges. 23 H. 792 (1917).

Defendant's right to one peremptory challenge to alternate
jurors under HRPP rule 24(c) is a right pertaining to all the alternate jurors
and therefore defendant shall not be called upon to exercise the challenge
until all potential alternate jurors have been examined and passed on
challenges for cause. 79 H. 165 (App.), 880 P.2d 217 (1994).

Denial of defendant's statutory right to peremptorily
challenge alternate jurors resulted in improper impaneling of alternate juror
and was plain error. 82 H. 499 (App.), 923 P.2d 916 (1996).

Discussed: 86 H. 214, 948 P.2d 1055 (1997).

See 9 H. 522 (1894); 11 H. 293 (1898).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next